Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-1004
Commission; access to books and records.

The commission and its agents shall be entitled to access to all books, records, and other information of a private water company which may be necessary for the commission to determine whether it may exercise regulatory authority under the Water Service Regulation Act and to carry out its regulatory authority under the act.

Laws 1994, LB 1002, § 4.